Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7843.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 7 of the General Laws entitled "CORPORATIONS, ASSOCIATIONS,
AND PARTNERSHIPS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 17
RHODE ISLAND DECENTRALIZED AUTONOMOUS ORGANIZATION ACT
7-17-1. Purpose and recognition.
(a) By adopting this legislation, Rhode Island can compete effectively for blockchain talent
and investment, drive economic growth in emerging tech sectors, and open new avenues for
projects, financing and public-private collaboration while upholding strong oversight,
cybersecurity protections, and full federal compliance.
(b) A decentralized autonomous organization may be recognized as a limited liability
company under Rhode Island law when it satisfies the governance and reporting requirements
established in this chapter.
7-17-2. Articles of organization.
A decentralized autonomous organization limited liability company shall include in its
articles of organization a declaration that it is a decentralized autonomous organization limited
liability company, the address of the on-chain governance contract or protocol, the name and
address of a registered agent for service of process in Rhode Island, and provisions that specify
member’s rights, voting thresholds, and procedures for amendments.

7-17-3. Governance and liability.
Governance may occur through smart contracts or digital consensus mechanisms. Member
liability is limited to the amount of each member’s financial contribution unless fraud or willful
misconduct is proven. A decentralized autonomous organization limited liability company may sue
and be sued in its own name.
7-17-4. Reporting and oversight.
Decentralized autonomous organization limited liability companies shall file an annual
report with the department of business regulation (” the department”) that discloses the status of
governance and any technical modifications. The department shall issue guidance on filing
procedures and review processes, and cybersecurity standards consistent with regard to compliance
with any laws pertaining to Rhode Island financial institutions cybersecurity law.
7-17-5. Regulatory sandbox.
The state shall establish a limited-term regulatory sandbox that permits decentralized
autonomous organization entities to pilot public and private projects, including infrastructure and
financing initiatives, under department oversight. Participants shall maintain compliance with anti-
money laundering, know-your-customer, and Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN)
obligations.
7-17-6. Dissolution and conversion.
A decentralized autonomous organization limited liability company may convert to a
traditional limited liability company or dissolve through a member vote recorded on-chain or by
written consent filed with the secretary of state.
7-17-7. Capital formation and project finance.
A decentralized autonomous organization limited liability company may engage in capital
formation through private placements of membership interests or governance tokens that comply
with federal securities laws, including Regulation D (private placements), and may finance
infrastructure projects, public-private partnerships, and other lawful initiatives through transparent
on-chain mechanisms, subject to all applicable state and federal regulatory requirements.
7-17-7. Rules and Regulations.
The department of business regulation shall promulgate rule and regulations relating to the
implementation and enforcement of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005609
========
LC005609 - Page 2 of 3